Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 11 Employment Rights of Members of Armed Forces

30-11-1.
Continuance on payroll of municipal employees in federal service.

Every city and town within this state is hereby authorized to continue on its payroll, either at full or partial pay, all or any of its regular officers and employees who are called into or enlist in the military or naval service of the United States, and to make such provisions as the city or town shall see fit to hold the positions thus vacated for these officers and employees at the expiration of their military or naval service, and to employ temporary assistants to perform the duties of these absent officers and employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 240; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-1

.

30-11-2.
Discrimination in employment against members of militia.

No employer, or officer, or agent of any corporation, company, or firm, or other person shall discharge any person from employment because of being an officer or enlisted person in the military forces of this state; or hinder or prevent that person from performing any military service he or she may be called upon to perform by proper authority; or dissuade any person from membership in the military forces of the state by threat of injury to that person in respect to his or her employment, trade, or business in case of his or her enlistment or commission. Any person violating any of the above provisions shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 221; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-2

.

30-11-3.
Restoration of national guard member to employment.

Any person who is a duly qualified member of the national guard of this state or any other state who, in order to perform any military service he or she may be called upon to perform by proper authority, leaves a position, other than a temporary position, in the employ of a Rhode Island employer, who shall give evidence of the satisfactory completion of that training, and who is still qualified to perform the duties of that position, shall be entitled to be restored to his or her previous or a similar position in the same status, pay, and seniority, and this period of absence for military training shall be construed as an absence with leave and without pay.

In addition to the provisions provided in this section, all national guard members on state active duty shall be entitled to the rights, protections, privileges, and immunities offered under the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994 (USERRA), Title 38 U.S. Code, Chapter 43, Sections 4301-4333, Public Law 103-353 [38 U.S.C. § 4301 et seq.].

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 221; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-3

; P.L. 2001, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 366, § 1.

30-11-4.
National guard member’s right to other advantages of employment.

A national guard member’s absence for military training will in no way affect the employee’s right to receive normal vacation, sick leave, bonus, advancement, and other advantages of his employment normally to be anticipated in his or her particular position.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 221; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-4

.

30-11-5.
Civil remedies of.

In the event of the failure of any employer to comply with §§

30-11-2

—

30-11-4

, the employee may, at his or her election, bring an action at law for damages for this noncompliance, or apply to the superior court for such equitable relief as may be just and proper under the circumstances, and this action shall take precedence on the court calendar.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 221; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-5

.

30-11-6.
Discrimination in employment against reservists.

No employer, or officer, or agent of any corporation, company, or firm, or other person shall discharge any person from employment because of being an officer or enlisted person in the reserve military forces of the United States; or hinder or prevent that person from performing any military service he or she may be called upon to perform by proper authority; or dissuade any person from membership in the reserve military forces of the United States by threat of injury to that person in respect to his or her employment, trade, or business in case of his or her enlistment or commission. Any person violating any of the above provisions shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3722, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-6

.

30-11-7.
Restoration of reservists to employment.

Any person who is a duly qualified member of any of the reserve forces of the United States who, in order to perform any military service he or she may be called upon to perform by proper authority, leaves a position, other than a temporary position, in the employ of an employer, who shall give evidence of the satisfactory completion of that training, and who is still qualified to perform the duties of that position, shall be entitled to be restored to his or her previous or a similar position in the same status, pay, and seniority, and this period of absence for military training shall be construed as an absence with leave and, within the discretion of the employer, the leave may be with or without pay.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3722, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-7

.

30-11-8.
Reservists’ right to other advantages of employment — Civil remedies.

A reservist’s absence for military training will in no way affect the employee’s right to receive normal vacation, sick leave, bonus, advancement, and other advantages of his or her employment normally to be anticipated in his or her particular position. In the event of the failure of any employer to comply with the foregoing, the employee may, at his or her election, bring an action at law for damages for this noncompliance, or apply to the superior court for such equitable relief as may be just and proper under the circumstances, and this action shall take precedence on the court calendar.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3722, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-8

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 35.

30-11-9.
Penalty — Surety for costs.

Any person found guilty of a misdemeanor as provided for in §§

30-11-2

and

30-11-6

shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or to confinement for not more than one year, or both. Any person making a complaint for the violation of the provisions of §§

30-11-2

—

30-11-8

shall not be required to give surety for costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3722, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

30-11-9

; P.L. 1962, ch. 114, § 1.